District of Columbia statutes.
47-392.12

Pledge of security interest in revenues of District government.

(a)

In general. —

The Authority may pledge or grant a security interest in revenues to individuals or entities purchasing bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to this part.

(b)

Dedication of revenue stream from District government. —

The Authority shall require the Mayor:

(1)

To pledge or direct taxes or other revenues otherwise payable to the District government (which are not otherwise pledged or committed), including payments from the Federal Government, to the Authority for purposes of securing repayment of bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to this part; and

(2)

To transfer the proceeds of any tax levied for purposes of securing such bonds, notes, or other obligations to the Authority immediately upon collection.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 137, Pub. L. 104-8, § 212
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-392.12.